Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

State Symbols

4-1-301. State flag or banner.

The flag or banner of this state shall be of the following design, colors and proportions, to wit: an oblong flag or banner in length one and two-thirds (12/3) times its width, the principal field of same to be of color red, but the flag or banner ending at its free or outer end in a perpendicular bar of blue, of uniform width, running from side to side, that is to say, from top to bottom of the flag or banner, and separated from the red field by a narrow margin or stripe of white of uniform width; the width of the white stripe to be one-fifth (1/5) that of the blue bar; and the total width of the bar and stripe together to be equal to one-eighth (1/8) of the width of the flag. In the center of the red field shall be a smaller circular field of blue, separated from the surrounding red field by a circular margin or stripe of white of uniform width and of the same width as the straight margin or stripe first mentioned. The breadth or diameter of the circular blue field, exclusive of the white margin, shall be equal to one-half (½) of the width of the flag. Inside the circular blue field shall be three (3) five-pointed stars of white distributed at equal intervals around a point, the center of the blue field, and of such size and arrangement that one (1) point of each star shall approach as closely as practicable without actually touching one (1) point of each of the other two (2) around the center point of the field; and the two (2) outer points of each star shall approach as nearly as practicable without actually touching the periphery of the blue field. The arrangement of the three (3) stars shall be such that the centers of no two (2) stars shall be in a line parallel to either the side or end of the flag, but intermediate between same; and the highest star shall be the one nearest the upper confined corner of the flag.

It is an offense to knowingly manufacture or sell a state flag that is not in compliance with subsection (a).

This subsection (b) shall apply only to flags that are manufactured, sold or offered for sale as official state flags and shall not apply to miniature flags or flags manufactured, sold or offered for sale as souvenirs, novelties, decorations or toys.

A violation of this subsection (b) is considered a deceptive business practice and punishable as provided in § 39-14-127.

Each Tennessee state flag manufactured or otherwise produced shall have imprinted on the flag a legend or other markings, or both, sufficient to clearly indicate the proper manner in which to fly or otherwise display the Tennessee state flag.

The purpose of this subsection (c) is to ensure that the public does not fly or otherwise display the Tennessee state flag in any incorrect manner, especially not upside down.

For the purposes of this subsection (c), “Tennessee state flag” includes all flags that are manufactured, sold or offered for sale as official state flags.

All official flags of the United States and of the state of Tennessee, purchased under a state contract, shall be manufactured in the United States.

Acts 1905, ch. 498; Shan., § 92a1; Code 1932, § 101; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-106; Acts 1990, ch. 1059, § 1; 2000, ch. 640, § 1; 2005, ch. 497, § 1.

Cross-References. Desecration of venerated object, §39-17-311.

Display of flag in courtrooms and at courthouses, §§5-7-108,5-7-109.

Attorney General Opinions. Commercial use of the state flag, OAG 95-083, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 95 (8/15/95).

4-1-302. State songs.

The official songs of this state shall be as follows:

“My Homeland, Tennessee” by Nell Grayson Taylor and Roy Lamont Smith, as adopted by House Joint Resolution 36 in 1925;

“When It's Iris Time In Tennessee” by Willa Mae Waid, as adopted by Acts 1935, chapter 154;

“My Tennessee” by Francis Hannah Tranum, as adopted by Senate Joint Resolution 35 in 1955, as the official public school song in Tennessee;

“The Tennessee Waltz” by Redd Stewart and Pee Wee King, as adopted by Senate Joint Resolution 9 in 1965;

“Rocky Top” by Boudleaux and Felice Bryant, as adopted by Acts 1982, chapter 545;

“The Pride of Tennessee” by Fred Congdon, Thomas Vaughn and Carol Elliot, as added by House Joint Resolution 221 in 1996, as the official song of the state of Tennessee; and

“Tennessee” by John R. Bean, as adopted by Acts 2011, chapter 242.

Acts 1935, ch. 154, §§ 1, 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 107.1, 107.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-107; Acts 1982, ch. 545, § 1; 2011, ch. 242, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. 1996 HJR 221 provided that “The Pride of Tennessee” by Fred Congdon, Thomas Vaughn and Carol Elliot is hereby adopted as an official song of the state of Tennessee.

For the preamble to the act concerning the recognition of “Tennessee” as an official state song and its lyrics, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 242.

4-1-303. State poems.

The poem entitled, “Oh Tennessee, My Tennessee,” by Admiral William Lawrence, is designated and adopted as an official state poem for this state, which poem reads as follows:

“Oh Tennessee, My Tennessee

What Love and Pride I Feel for Thee.

You Proud Ole State, the Volunteer,

Your Proud Traditions I Hold Dear.

I Revere Your Many Heroes

Who Bravely Fought our Country's Foes.

Renowned Statesmen, so Wise and Strong,

Who Served our Country Well and Long.

I Thrill at Thought of Mountains Grand;

Rolling Green Hills and Fertile Farm Land;

Earth Rich with Stone, Mineral and Ore;

Forests Dense and Wild Flowers Galore;

Powerful Rivers that Bring us Light;

Deep Lakes with Fish and Fowl in Flight;

Thriving Cities and Industries;

Fine Schools and Universities;

Strong Folks of Pioneer Descent,

Simple, Honest, and Reverent.

Beauty and Hospitality

Are the Hallmarks of Tennessee.

And O'er the World as I May Roam,

No Place Exceeds my Boyhood Home.

And Oh How Much I Long to See

My Native Land, My Tennessee.”

The poem entitled, “My Tennessee,” by Michael McDonald, is designated and adopted as an official state poem for this state, which poem reads as follows:

Cowboy boots, pickup trucks,

White-faced bulls, and lespedeza hay,

Cottontails runnin', beagle dogs singin'

Huntin' with Grandpa, on a gray, frosty day.

Sunday mornin' preachin, hell-fire and brimstone,

Country ham for dinner, banana puddin' and ice tea,

Pitchin' them horse-shoes, watermelon cuttin',

Friends and kinfolk underneath the old oak tree.

Tennessee, you're a raging river,

A Lookout Mountain, seeing as far as you can see,

Bloody Shiloh, brother against brother,

General Grant and Robert E. Lee,

Sittin' on a feed sack, pickin' my guitar,

Writin' them songs, in a country kinda way,

Whittlin' on a cedar stick, spittin' tobacco juice,

Spinnin' them yarns, about by-gone days.

Andrew Jackson and ol' Davy Crockett

Always were heroes to me.

Buckskin britches, black-powder rifles,

Dreamin' ‘bout freedom and the days that used to be.

Tennessee I'll never leave you,

You're the heart and soul of me,

Mighty Mississippi, Great Smoky Mountains,

You're all these things, and more to me.

Matched-pair of sorrel mules, Tennessee walkers,

Munchin' on a moon pie and an R.O.C.;

Duck-head overalls, wish I had a Goo Goo;

All rared back listenin' to the Grand Ole Opry.

Tennessee I'll never leave you,

You're the heart and soul of me,

Mighty Mississippi, Great Smoky Mountains,

All these things, my Tennessee.

Acts 1973, ch. 111, § 1; 1977, ch. 329, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-116; Acts 2019, ch. 215, § 1.

4-1-304. State slogan.

The following is hereby adopted as an official slogan for this state: “Tennessee — America at Its Best.” This slogan may be used in advertising the state and its attractions for industry, recreation and pleasant living.

Acts 1965, ch. 33, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-114.

4-1-305. State tree.

The tulip poplar is designated and adopted as the official state tree of this state.

Acts 1947, ch. 204, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 107.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-108.

4-1-306. State wild flowers.

The official wild flowers of this state shall be as follows:

The passion flower, family passiflora incarnate ; and

Tennessee Echinacea, Echinacea tennesseensis .

Acts 1973, ch. 16, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-117; Acts 2012, ch. 829, § 1.

4-1-307. State cultivated flower.

The iris, family iridaceae , is designated as the state cultivated flower.

Acts 1973, ch. 16, § 2; T.C.A., § 4-118.

4-1-308. State insects — State agricultural insect.

The well-known firefly, or lightning bug beetle, and the ladybird beetle, commonly known as the ladybug, are hereby designated as the official state insects.

The honeybee is designated as the official agricultural insect of Tennessee in tribute to its fundamental role in the production of all crops.

Acts 1975, ch. 292, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-120; Acts 1990, ch. 725, § 1.

4-1-309. State rock.

The useful and attractive calcium carbonate, commonly known as limestone, is hereby designated as the official state rock.

Acts 1979, ch. 42, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-128.

4-1-310. State gem.

The Tennessee pearl is hereby designated as the official state gem. This designation is not intended to prohibit such activities as dredging, filling, damming or other acts that are otherwise subject to regulation and control by the United States corps of engineers, the Tennessee Valley authority, or other governmental entities.

The historic Tennessee River Freshwater Pearl Farm and Museum located in Camden, Benton County, Tennessee is hereby designated the official site of freshwater pearl culturing in the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1979, ch. 192, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-129; Acts 2004, ch. 506, § 1.

Cross-References. Permits for pearl culturing, §70-2-220.

4-1-311. Official railroad museums.

The following are designated as official railroad museums in this state:

The Tennessee Valley Railroad Museum, located in Hamilton County, which shall be indicated by an appropriate marker erected by the state. The signs shall be placed on the property of the museum and shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in cost; and

The Cowan Railroad Museum, located in Franklin County, which shall be indicated by an appropriate marker erected by the state. The museum may also receive appropriations as the general assembly deems necessary, grants from state or federal agencies, and donations from private or public sources.

Acts 1978, ch. 547, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-127; Acts 2007, ch. 193, § 1.

4-1-312. State folk dance.

The square dance is hereby designated as the official state folk dance.

Acts 1980, ch. 829, § 1.

4-1-313. Porcelain painting.

Porcelain painting (china painting) is recognized as a fine art in Tennessee.

Acts 1981, ch. 55, § 1.

4-1-314. Great seal of the state of Tennessee.

The great seal of the state of Tennessee shall be in the shape of a circle. The circumference of the circle shall bear the words “THE GREAT SEAL OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE” and in the lower part of the circumference shall be the date “1796,” being the year in which the constitution of Tennessee was adopted and Tennessee became one of the United States.

Inside the upper semicircle of the circle shall be set the numerals “XVI,” being the number of the state in chronological order within the United States; below the numerals shall be the figures of a plough, sheaf of wheat and cotton plant, emblematic of agriculture within the state; and under the base of the upper semicircle shall be the word “AGRICULTURE.”

Inside the lower semicircle of the circle shall be set the figure of a boat with sail, emblematic of commercial activity in the state; and below this figure the word “COMMERCE.”

The size of the seal embossed shall be not greater in diameter than two and one-quarter inches (2¼") nor smaller in diameter than one and three-quarter inches (1¾").

The size of printed seals shall conform to the range of sizes as permitted by the rules of the state publication committee.

Until a different rendering of this design is submitted by the governor to the secretary of state and approved by resolution by both houses of the general assembly, voting separately, the design in use as of May 17, 1987 is hereby validated and adopted, to wit:

Click to view

Acts 1987, ch. 402, § 1.

4-1-315. State motto.

The motto of this state shall be “Agriculture and Commerce,” as proclaimed on the great seal of the state of Tennessee since 1801.

Acts 1987, ch. 402, § 2.

4-1-316. State commercial fish.

The channel catfish is hereby designated as the official state commercial fish.

Acts 1988, ch. 489, § 1.

4-1-317. State sport fish.

The small-mouth bass is hereby designated as the official state sport fish.

Acts 1988, ch. 489, § 2; 2005, ch. 277, § 1.

4-1-318. State game bird.

The bobwhite quail is hereby designated as the official state game bird.

Acts 1988, ch. 775, § 1.

4-1-319. State butterfly.

The beautiful zebra swallowtail, Eurytides marcellus , is hereby designated as the official state butterfly.

Acts 1994, ch. 896, § 1.

4-1-320. State amphibian.

The unique Tennessee cave salamander, Gyrinophilus palleucus , is hereby designated as the official state amphibian.

Acts 1995, ch. 367, § 1.

4-1-321. State reptile.

The widespread eastern box turtle, Terrapene carolina , is hereby designated as the official state reptile.

Acts 1995, ch. 367, § 2.

4-1-322. Official poem of the Tennessee Bicentennial.

The poem entitled “Who We Are” by Margaret Britton Vaughn, Poet Laureate of Tennessee, is designated and adopted as the official poem of Tennessee's Bicentennial, which poem reads as follows:

Who We Are

The Bicentennial of Tennessee

1796-1996

The fertile soil of Tennessee

Grew more than corn, tobacco, and cotton,

It grew a crop of people who are

Trailblazers, child raisers, flag wavers, soul savers.

Like the roots of the tulip poplar,

Our feet are planted deeply

Into good living, neighbor giving, God fearing.

Like the iris, buttercup and wild daisies,

Our towns have sprung up

In valleys, basins, mountains, plains and plateaus

That house cabins, mansions and hillside chateaus.

We're the one-room schoolhouse in the hollow;

We're the university grad and the front-porch scholar.

We're Davy Crockett at the Alamo,

Sergeant York, World War I hero.

We're Cordell Hull who served Roosevelt;

We're Chief Sequoyah and his Cherokee alphabet.

We're W.C. Handy and the Memphis Blues;

We're Ida B. Wells and Civil Rights news,

And Grand Ole Opry with old wooden pews.

We're “Rocky Top” and “Tennessee Waltz” the same;

We're “Star Spangled Banner” before the game.

We're mockingbirds singing Appalachian folk songs;

We're country church sing-alongs.

We're hand clappers, toe tappers, knee slappers

And Mama's lap lullaby nappers.

We're Jackson, Johnson and James K. Polk;

We're city slickers and poor hill folk;

We're Anne Dallas Dudley and the Suffrage Vote.

We're John Sevier, Don Sundquist and governors galore;

We're congressmen, mayors and Vice President Gore.

We're Wilma Rudolph's run for the gold

And Sunday golfers' eighteenth hole.

We're Christmas Eve and the Fourth of July;

We're 4-H and homemade chess pie.

We're TVA rivers, creeks and man-made lakes;

We're ruts in dirt roads and interstates.

We're all religions, creeds and peoples of race;

We're Tennesseans who love the home place.

We're the Volunteer State and will always be

Ready to go when someone's in need.

As our trees turn green and our barns turn gray.

We celebrate our two hundredth birthday.

We know we've done our best, stood the test,

And will be laid to rest

In the fertile soil of Tennessee.

Acts 1997, ch. 337, § 1.

4-1-323. Official state tartan.

The design adopted by the Heart of Tennessee Scottish Celebration in conjunction with all the other Scottish Societies in Tennessee is designated as the official state tartan for Tennessee. The design is described as follows: A symmetrical tartan sett, using the following colors: natural white, dark green, purple, red, and dark blue. The colors shall be employed in a thread count of white — 2, green — 20, purple — 2, green — 12, red — 2, green — 2, purple — 2, white — 2, blue — 20 and red — 4. The pattern pivot is red line to return to green 20.

Acts 1999, ch. 82, § 1.

4-1-324. State theatre of Tennessee.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Tennessee Theatre is hereby designated as the state theatre of Tennessee.

Acts 1999, ch. 166, § 1.

4-1-325. State horse.

The Tennessee Walking Horse is hereby designated as the official state horse.

Acts 2000, ch. 596, § 1.

4-1-326. State aviation hall of fame.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Tennessee Aviation Hall of Fame, which is located at the Gatlinburg-Pigeon Forge Airport in Sevier County and which has been founded for the purpose of honoring aviation pioneers and leaders in Tennessee, is designated as the official state aviation hall of fame.

The Tennessee Aviation Hall of Fame and affiliated Tennessee Museum of Aviation are designated as the official state repository and archive for aviation history.

Acts 2001, ch. 78, § 1; 2003, ch. 158, § 1.

4-1-327. State fruit.

The delicious tomato, Lycopersicon lycopersicum , is designated as the official state fruit.

Acts 2003, ch. 154, § 1.

4-1-328. Railroad library.

The A.C. Kalmbach Memorial Library in Chattanooga is an official railroad library of the state of Tennessee.

Acts 2004, ch. 628, § 1.

4-1-329. Official salute to the Tennessee flag.

The following salute written by Lucy Steele Harrison is designated and adopted as the first official salute to the flag of Tennessee:

“Three white stars on a field of blue

God keep them strong and ever true

It is with pride and love that we

Salute the Flag of Tennessee.”

The following salute written by Miss John Bostick is designated and adopted as the second official salute to the flag of Tennessee:

“Flag of Tennessee, I salute thee

To thee I pledge my allegiance with

My affection, my service and my life.”

Acts 2006, ch. 841, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 841, § 2 provided that representatives of the Tennessee Historical Society, Tennessee History for Kids, The Tennessee Society, Daughters of the American Revolution and any other recognized group with an interest in Tennessee history or the Tennessee flag are urged to meet and discuss the issue of official salutes to the flag of Tennessee. If the group is able to develop recommendations for other salutes to the flag of Tennessee, or if the group determines there have been other salutes adopted by the general assembly or otherwise generally recognized, such group shall so state in a report to be filed with the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the house of representatives.

4-1-330. State mineral.

Agate is designated as the official state mineral.

Acts 2009, ch. 30, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act establishing agate as the official state mineral of Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 30.

4-1-331. State beverage.

Milk is designated as the official state beverage.

Acts 2009, ch. 31, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act establishing milk as the official state beverage of Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 31.

Cross-References. Dairy Farmers Prosperity Act, §53-3-301 et seq.

4-1-332. State evergreen tree.

The eastern red cedar, Juniperus virginiana , is designated as the official state evergreen tree.

Acts 2012, ch. 567, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning the designation of the eastern red cedar as the official state evergreen tree, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 567.

4-1-333. Official state botanical garden.

The University of Tennessee Botanical Gardens are designated as the official state botanical garden.

Acts 2013, ch. 152, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning the official state botanical garden, please refer to Acts 2013, ch. 152.

4-1-334. State symbol of remembrance to honor fallen military service members.

The Honor and Remember Flag is designated as the official state symbol of remembrance and as the symbol of our state's concern and commitment to honoring and remembering the lives of all members of the United States armed forces who have lost their lives while serving, or as a result of service, and their families.

The design of the Honor and Remember Flag, created by Honor and Remember Inc., shall be of the following design:

The principal field of the flag shall be red to represent the blood shed by brave servicemembers who sacrificed their lives for freedom;

The white banner at the bottom of the flag to represent the purity of that sacrifice;

The center of the flag shall feature a gold star outlined in blue. The blue star-shaped border represents active service in military conflict and dates back to World War I. The gold star signifies the ultimate sacrifice of a warrior in active service who is not returning home and reflects the value of life given;

The folded flag element below the gold star highlights this nation's final tribute to a fallen servicemember and a family's sacrifice; and

The center of the gold star shall be filled by a flame, to symbolize the eternal spirit of the departed.

Acts 2014, ch. 539, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 549, § 1, Acts 2014, ch. 571, § 1 and Acts 2014, ch. 821, § 1 all purported to enact §4-1-334. Section4-1-334 was previously enacted by Acts 2014, ch. 539, § 1, therefore, the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 549, § 1 was designated as §4-1-335; the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 571, § 1 was designated as §4-1-336; and the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 821, § 1 was designated as §4-1-337 by the authority of the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning designation of the Honor and Remember Flag as a symbol of remembrance of fallen military service members, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 539.

4-1-335. Official state fife and drum corps.

The Watauga Valley Fife and Drum Corps is hereby designated as the official state fife and drum corps.

Acts 2014, ch. 549, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 549, § 1, Acts 2014, ch. 571, § 1 and Acts 2014, ch. 821, § 1 all purported to enact §4-1-334. Section4-1-334 was previously enacted by Acts 2014, ch. 539, § 1, therefore, the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 549, § 1 was designated as §4-1-335; the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 571, § 1 was designated as §4-1-336; and the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 821, § 1 was designated as §4-1-337 by the authority of the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning the official state fife and drum corps, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 549.

4-1-336. Official state artifact.

“Sandy,” the ancient stone statue discovered in 1939 on Sellars Farm in Wilson County, being a prime example of the Tennessee-Cumberland Style of Mississippian Stone Statuary crafted and used during the Mississippian Period, AD 800 – 1500, is recognized as the official state artifact of Tennessee.

Acts 2014, ch. 571, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 549, § 1, Acts 2014, ch. 571, § 1 and Acts 2014, ch. 821, § 1 all purported to enact §4-1-334. Section4-1-334 was previously enacted by Acts 2014, ch. 539, § 1, therefore, the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 549, § 1 was designated as §4-1-335; the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 571, § 1 was designated as §4-1-336; and the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 821, § 1 was designated as §4-1-337 by the authority of the code commission.

4-1-337. Official state pet.

Dogs and cats that are adopted from Tennessee animal shelters and rescues are designated as the official state pet.

Acts 2014, ch. 821, § 1.

Compiler's Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 549, § 1, Acts 2014, ch. 571, § 1 and Acts 2014, ch. 821, § 1 all purported to enact §4-1-334. Section4-1-334 was previously enacted by Acts 2014, ch. 539, § 1, therefore, the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 549, § 1 was designated as §4-1-335; the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 571, § 1 was designated as §4-1-336; and the enactment by Acts 2014, ch. 821, § 1 was designated as §4-1-337 by the authority of the code commission.

4-1-338. Official state symbol.

The official state symbol shall be the circular feature of the state flag, adopted by chapter 498 of the Acts of 1905, and shall be of the following design: a circular field of blue surrounded by a circular stripe of white that is one-twentieth (1/20) the diameter of the circular field of blue. Inside the circular field of blue shall be three (3) five-pointed stars of white distributed at equal intervals around a point, the center of the blue field, and of such size and arrangement that one (1) point of each star shall approach as closely as practicable without actually touching one (1) point of each of the other two (2) around the center point of the blue field; and the two (2) outer points of each star shall approach as nearly as practicable without actually touching the periphery of the blue field. The arrangement of the three (3) stars shall be such that the centers of no two (2) stars shall align horizontally or vertically, but intermediate between same; and the highest star shall be the one located in the upper left of the blue field.

Acts 2016, ch. 534, § 1.

4-1-339. Official state plane.

The Boeing B-17F known as the Memphis Belle is designated as the official state airplane.

Acts 2017, ch. 33, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning naming of the Boeing B-17F, known as the Memphis Belle, as official state airplane, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 33.

4-1-340. Official state community theater.

The Oak Ridge Playhouse is designated as an official state community theater.

Acts 2017, ch. 101, § 1.

4-1-341. Here's the Beef Festival.

The Here's the Beef Festival in Giles County is designated as the official state beef festival.

Acts 2018, ch. 603, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning state symbols and the Here's the Beef Festival, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 603.

4-1-342. Official state buck dance competition.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Robert Spicer Memorial Buck Dance Championship is hereby designated the official buck dance competition of Tennessee.

Acts 2019, ch. 2, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning buck dancing, see 2019, ch. 2.

4-1-343. Official state dog.

The bluetick coonhound is designated as the official state dog.

Acts 2019, ch. 7, § 1.

4-1-344. Official state nickname.

The official nickname of this state is “The Volunteer State.”

Acts 2020, ch. 516, § 1.